Mississippi statutes. Title 85. Debtor-Creditor Relationship
Article 17. General Provisions.

§ 85-7-261.
How lien created.

Unless otherwise expressly provided, the liens created or mentioned in this chapter shall exist by virtue of the relation of the parties, and without any writing, or if in writing, without recording; and the rights and liens conferred may be asserted and enforced by the assigns and personal representatives of the lienor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1361; 1892, § 2683; 1906, § 3043; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2401; 1930, § 2273; 1942, § 371.

§ 85-7-263.
Liens on the same building, etc. concurrent.

All liens for erecting, constructing, altering, or repairing the same building, house, structure, fixture, boat, water craft, railroad, or railroad embankment shall be concurrent, and shall be paid in proportion out of the proceeds of the property when sold; and in case the sheriff shall have doubts as to the proper application of the money, he may return the same to the court, stating the question, for its determination.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 39, art. 14; 1871, § 1617; 1880, § 1392; 1892, § 2712; 1906, § 3072; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2432; 1930, § 2272; 1942, § 370.

§ 85-7-265.
Proceedings under justice courts.

Justice courts shall have jurisdiction of cases arising under this chapter where the amount does not exceed the jurisdictional amount provided for in Section 9-11-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, and the proceedings shall be as nearly in accordance with the provisions of this chapter as may be practicable, and the parties shall have the right of appeal as in other cases. But the sale of buildings under their judgments may be advertised and made as sales of personal property levied on under execution issued by the justice court.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 45, art. 7 (3); 1857, ch. 39, art. 15; 1871, § 1618; 1880, § 1393; 1892, § 2713; 1906, § 3073; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2433; 1930, § 2271; 1942, § 369; Laws, 1989, ch. 406, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1989.